src/mrj-lex.txt
LEXICON Root
TESTINGTESTING ;
!SUBSTANDARDS ; ! temporary solution

! contlexes                             ! the file, where the contlex is located
! ------------                          ! ---------------------------------------
A ;                                     ! ../../tmp/out/A_mrj-lex.xml
ADV ;                                   ! ../../tmp/out/ADV_mrj-lex.xml
!AD-A ;                                  ! ../../tmp/out/AD-A_mrj-lex.xml
Abbreviation ;                          ! abbr-mrj-lex.txt
!ABBR ;                                 ! ../../tmp/out/ABBR_mrj-lex.xml           !2012-03-14
Acronym ;                               ! acro-mrj-lex.txt
!ACRON ;                                ! ../../tmp/out/ACRON_mrj-lex.xml 
!BAHUVRIHI ;                             ! ../../tmp/out/BAHUVRIHI_mrj-lex.xml
CONJ ;                                  ! ../../tmp/out/CONJ_mrj-lex.xml
!DEM ;                                   ! ../../tmp/out/DEM_mrj-lex.xml !! Dem can be Adn or Pron
!DV-N ;                                  ! ../../tmp/out/DV-N_mrj-lex.xml
!IDIOM ;                                ! ../../tmp/out/IDIOM_mrj-lex.xml          !2012-03-14
INTERJ ;                                ! ../../tmp/out/INTERJ_mrj-lex.xml
!MANNER ;                                ! ../../tmp/out/MANNER_mrj-lex.xml
N ;                                     ! ../../tmp/out/N_mrj-lex.xml
                                        ! working_files/PHRASE-N_mrj-lex.xml
                                        ! working_files/PHRASE-V_mrj-lex.xml
PTC ;                                   ! ../../tmp/out/PTC_mrj-lex.xml !! 
!N-DV ;                                 ! ../../tmp/out/N-DV_mrj-lex.xml           !2012-03-14
!N-F ;                                  ! ../../tmp/out/N-F_mrj-lex.xml            !2012-03-14
!No-e-element-N ;                       ! ../../tmp/out/No-e-element-N_mrj-lex.xml !2012-03-14
!No-e-element-V ;                       ! ../../tmp/out/No-e-element-V_mrj-lex.xml !2012-03-14
!QNT ;                                   ! ../../tmp/out/QNT_mrj-lex.xml
NUM ;                                  ! ../../tmp/out/NUM_mrj-lex.xml            !2012-03-14
!NUM-PREFIXES ;                         ! num-mrj-morph.txt                        !2012-03-14
PCLE ;                                  ! ../../tmp/out/PCLE_mrj-lex.xml    ! particles
!PART-ONOM ;                            ! ../../tmp/out/PART-ONOM_mrj-lex.xml      !2012-03-14
!PERS ;                                  ! pronoun !pers-mrj-morph.txt
                                        ! ../../tmp/out/PERS_mrj-lex.xml.txt
POSTP ;                                 ! ../../tmp/out/POSTP_mrj-lex.xml.txt

PRON ;                                  ! ../../tmp/out/PRON_mrj-lex.xml
!PRON-INDEF ;                           ! ../../tmp/out/PRON-INDEF_mrj-lex.xml                           !2012-03-14
!PRON-INTER ;                           ! ../../tmp/out/PRON-INTER_mrj-lex.xml                           !2012-03-14
!PRON-NEG ;                             ! pron-mrj-morph.txt                                             !2012-03-14
!PRON-QNT ;                             ! ../../tmp/out/PRON-QNT_mrj-lex.xml                             !2012-03-14
!PRON-REFL ;                            ! ../../tmp/out/PRON-REFL_mrj-lex.xml                            !2012-03-14
!PRON-REL ;                             ! pron-mrj-morph.txt                                             !2012-03-14
PROP ;                                  ! ../../tmp/out/PROP_mrj-lex.xml
!PROP-RUSSIAN-TOPONYMS ;                ! ../../tmp/out/PROPRUSSIAN-TOPONYMS_mrj-lex.xml                 !2012-03-14
!PROP-RUSSIAN-MALE-SURNAMES-Derivable ; ! ../../tmp/out/PROP-RUSSIAN-MALE-SURNAMES-Derivable_mrj-lex.xml !2012-03-14
!PROP-CYRILLIC-MALE-SURNAMES ;          ! ../../tmp/out/PROP-CYRILLIC-MALE-SURNAMES_mrj-lex.xml          !2012-03-14
!PROP-RUSSIAN-MALE-NAMES-Derivable ;    ! ../../tmp/out/PROP-RUSSIAN-MALE-NAMES-Derivable_mrj-lex.xml    !2012-03-14
!PROP-CYRILLIC-MALE-NAMES ;              ! ../../tmp/out/PROP-CYRILLIC-MALE-NAMES_mrj-lex.xml
!PROP-CYRILLIC-FEMALE-NAMES ;            ! ../../tmp/out/PROP-CYRILLIC-MALE-NAMES_mrj-lex.xml
Punctuation ;                           ! punct-mrj-lex.txt
!SPAT ;                                  ! ../../tmp/out/SPAT_mrj-lex.xml.txt
!TEMP ;                                  ! ../../tmp/out/TEMP_mrj-lex.xml.txt
VB ;                                     ! ../../tmp/out/VB_mrj-lex.xml
VB1 ;                                     ! ../../tmp/out/VB1_mrj-lex.xml
VB2 ;                                     ! ../../tmp/out/VB2_mrj-lex.xml

!VERBNEGATIVE ;                          ! verb-mrj-morph.txt




! ======================================================= !
! These lexica are for parts of speech without morphology !
! ======================================================= !

! Compounding

LEXICON R
%- N ;

LEXICON BahuvTag-kal
+Bahuvrihi: Adj-od ;

LEXICON BahuvTag-pango
+Bahuvrihi: Adj-nachko ;

LEXICON BahuvTag-kudo
+Bahuvrihi: Adj-shumbra ;


! ============ !
! Interj lexica !
! ============ !

LEXICON InterjTag
+Interj: Clitic ;

LEXICON Interj-Imp
+Interj+Imp+2Sg: ImpClitic ;
+Interj+Imp+2Pl:%>дО1 ImpClitic ;

LEXICON FormulaicTag
+Interj+Formulaic: # ;

LEXICON VocativeTag
+Interj+Voc: # ;

! ============ !
! Postp lexica !
! ============ !

LEXICON ejs-PO
эйсэ+Po+Ill:эйс Clitic ;
эйсэ+Po+Ine:эйсэ kudo-Conjugation ;
эйсэ+Po+Ela:эйстэ kudo-Conjugation ;
эйсэ+Po+Ill:эйз osh-SPAT-PossX ;
эйсэ+Po+Ine:эйсэ kudo-SPAT-PossX ;
эйсэ+Po+Ela:эйстэ kudo-SPAT-PossX ;

LEXICON marto-PO
+Po+Abs: Clitic ;
+Po+COM: kudo-Possessives2 ; 
+Po+Der/MWN: kudo-N ;


LEXICON kudo-PO-ILL
+Po+Ill:%>с Clitic ;
+Po+Ill:%>з osh-Possessives2 ;

LEXICON vaksso-SPAT
 malaso-SPAT ;
+Po+LV+Ela:%>О1стО1 kudo-Conjugation ;
+Po+LV+Ill:%>О1с Clitic ;
+Po+LV+Ine:%>О1сО1 kudo-Conjugation ;

LEXICON jutkso-SPAT
+Po+Prl:%>Г2а kudo-SPAT-PossX ;
+Po+Prl:%>Г2а kudo-Conjugation ;
 langso-SPAT ;

LEXICON langso-SPAT
+Po+Ela:%>VLossстО1 kudo-Conjugation ;
+Po+Ill:%>VLossс Clitic ;
+Po+Ine:%>VLossсО1 kudo-Conjugation ;
+Po+Ela:%>VLossстО1 kudo-SPAT-PossX ;
+Po+Ill:%>О1з osh-SPAT-PossX ;
+Po+Ine:%>VLossсО1 kudo-SPAT-PossX ;

LEXICON malaso-SPAT
+Ela:%>стО1 kudo-Conjugation ;
+Ill:%>с Clitic ;
+Ine:%>сО1 kudo-Conjugation ;
+Prl:%>Г2а kudo-Conjugation ;
+Po+Ela:%>стО1 kudo-SPAT-PossX ;
+Po+Ill:%>О1з osh-SPAT-PossX ;
+Po+Ine:%>сО1 kudo-SPAT-PossX ;
+Po+Prl:%>Г2а kudo-SPAT-PossX ;

LEXICON ushoso-SPAT
+Spat+Ela:%>стО1 kudo-Conjugation ;
+Spat+Ill:%>с Clitic ;
+Spat+Ine:%>сО1 kudo-Conjugation ;
+Spat+Prl:%>Г2а kudo-Conjugation ;

LEXICON kudo-SPAT-PossX
+Px1Sg:%>нЬ2 kal-Conjugation ;
+Px1Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>м kal-Conjugation ;
+Px2Sg:%>тЬ2 kit-Conjugation ;
+Px2Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>нтЬ2 kit-Conjugation ;
+Px3Sg:%>нзО1 kudo-Conjugation ;
+Px1Pl:%>нО1к lak-Conjugation ;
+Px2Pl:%>нк lak-Conjugation ;
+Px3Pl:%>ст kit-Conjugation ;

LEXICON osh-SPAT-PossX
+Px1Sg:%>О1нЬ2 kal-Conjugation ;
+Px1Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>О1м kal-Conjugation ;
+Px2Sg:%>О1тЬ2 kit-Conjugation ;
+Px2Sg+Use/Sub/Dial:%>О1нтЬ2 kit-Conjugation ;
+Px3Sg:%>О1нзО1 kudo-Conjugation ;
+Px1Pl:%>О1нО1к lak-Conjugation ;
+Px2Pl:%>О1нк lak-Conjugation ;
+Px3Pl:%>О1ст kit-Conjugation ;



! This contlex allows for relational word which, otherwise, are open 
! to extensive declension
LEXICON PostpTag
+Po: Clitic ;

LEXICON Dat-1Arg
+Po+DAT: Clitic ;



! ==================================== !
! Lexica called End, whatever they are !
! ==================================== !

!LEXICON ABBR-IS_ADV
!+ABBR: ADVTAG ;

LEXICON Ad-ATag ! 
+AdA: # ;

LEXICON AdvTag ! 
+Adv: Clitic ;

LEXICON Adv-kudo ! Coping with stem structure
 AdvTag ;

LEXICON Adv_Phrase ! 
+Adv: # ;

LEXICON Adv-Ideoph ! 
+Adv-Ideoph: Clitic ;
! сорк, кальцк ; twang, thwang, bang

LEXICON Adv-Ideoph-Ine ! 
+Adv-Ideoph+Ine: Clitic ;

LEXICON Exclusive ! 
+Adv+Exclusive: Clitic ;

LEXICON Adv-Ine ! 
+Ine: AdvTag ;

LEXICON Adv-Tra ! 
+Tra: AdvTag ;

LEXICON MannerTag ! 
+Adv+Manner: Clitic ;

LEXICON Manner-Interr ! 
+Interr+Adv+Manner: Clitic ;

LEXICON Pred2 !
+Pred2: Clitic ;
+Pred2+Der/MWN: kudo-N ;

!! spatial adverbs 
!! dependent and independent case marking 
LEXICON Spat-NoArg
+Adv+Spat-NoArg: Clitic ;

LEXICON Spat-Interr
+Interr+Spat: # ;

LEXICON SpatTag
+Spat: Clitic ;

LEXICON Spat-Ela
+Spat+Ela: Clitic ;

LEXICON Spat-Ine
+Spat+Ine: Clitic ;

LEXICON Spat-Lat
+Spat+Lat: Clitic ;

LEXICON Spat-Prl
+Spat+Prl: Clitic ;

!!Temporal tags with cases
LEXICON TempTag
+Adv+Temp: Clitic ;

!! This marking would indicate a word form that may be 
!  construed as an adv as well as a adposition.
LEXICON Temp-NoArg
+Adv+Temp: Clitic ;

LEXICON Temp-Coll
+Coll+Adv+Temp: Clitic ;

LEXICON Temp-Distr
+Distr+Adv+Temp: Clitic ;

LEXICON Temp-Ela
+Ela+Adv+Temp: Clitic ;

LEXICON Temp-Ill
+Ill+Adv+Temp: Clitic ;

LEXICON Temp-Indef
+Adv+Temp+Indef: Clitic ;

LEXICON Temp-Interr
+Adv+Temp+Interr: Clitic ;

LEXICON Temp-Lat
+Lat+Adv+Temp: Clitic ;

LEXICON Temp-ms
+Der/мс+Ill+Adv+Temp: Clitic ;

LEXICON Temp-Pl
+Pl+Adv+Temp: Clitic ;

LEXICON Temp-Prl
+Prl+Adv+Temp: Clitic ;

LEXICON Temp-Temp
+Temp+Adv+Temp: Clitic ;

LEXICON lak-N-Temp
+Adv+Temp: Clitic ;
+Adv+Temp+Der/MWN: lak-N ;

LEXICON kit-N-Temp
+Adv+Temp: Clitic ;
+Adv+Temp+Der/MWN: kit-N ;

LEXICON kudo-N-Temp
+Adv+Temp: Clitic ;
+Adv+Temp+Der/MWN: kudo-N ;

LEXICON Temp-1Arg-Ela
+Po+Ela+Temp: Clitic ; !This will require Possessor Indices



LEXICON Cc
+CC: # ;

LEXICON Cs
+CS: # ;


!LEXICON EndConj
!+CC: # ;

!!Let's remember that Particle is merely an expression of form
!LEXICON PCLE
!а+Pcle+Neg:а # ;
!аволь+Pcle+Neg+Emphatic:аволь # ;
!ай+Pcle+Neg+Emphatic:ай kal-N ;
!апак+Pcle+Neg:апак lak-Tenses-Obl ;
!седе+Pcle+Compar:седе # ;
!сех+Pcle+Superl:сех # ;
!сех+Pcle+Superl+Abl:сехте # ; ! This is a comparative construction
!уш+Pcle+Intensifier:уш # ;

LEXICON Pcle-Compar-Stnd
+Pcle+Compar: # ;

LEXICON Pcle-Epist
+Pcle+Epist: # ;

LEXICON Pcle-Neg-Contrast
+Pcle+Neg+Intensive: # ;

LEXICON Pcle-Neg
+Pcle+Neg: # ;

LEXICON Pcle-Superl
+Pcle+Superl: # ;

LEXICON PcleTag
+Pcle: # ;


!LEXICON EndPart
!+Pcle: # ;

!LEXICON EndInterj
!+Interj: # ;

LEXICON Interj
+Interj: # ;

LEXICON N-Voc-Px1Sg
+N+Px1Sg+Interj+Voc: # ;

!LEXICON EndNeg 
!+CC+Neg: # ; ! ни

!LEXICON EndQST
!+Qst: # ;

!LEXICON ONOM-End
!+Onom: # ;

!LEXICON DESCR-End
!+Descr: # ;



! ======= !
! Clitics !
! ======= !

LEXICON lak-Clitic
+Use/Sub/Short+Clt/Гак:%>KLossГ1ак # ;
 Clitic ;

LEXICON Clitic
            # ; 
+Clt/Гак:%>Г1ак # ;


! List of spurious lexica
! These should be fixed.


! This lexicon would allow a loop whereby any full form
! could be treated as a noun
! E.G. мезеяк # 'anything'
! E.G. мезеяк+ось # 'This _anything_ you are talking about'
!LEXICON Encapsulate


!LEXICON ADV-SUPERL
!+Adv+Superl: # ;


LEXICON TESTINGTESTING

Ыджыд TESTCOMP ;
син TESTCOMP ;
официал TESTCOMP ;
радиоактив TESTCOMP ;

LEXICON TESTCOMP

+CmpTest: # ;


!!!
!formerly Spatials_4cx
LEXICON alo-Spat
 alo-Spat-NoArg ;
 alo-Spat-1Arg ;

LEXICON alo-Spat-NoArg
+Adv+Spat+OrthPhon+Loc+Der/це:%>це kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Adv+Spat+Loc+Der/се:%>се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Adv+Spat+Der/кс:%>кс osh-N ;
+Adv+Spat+Lat:%>О1в Clitic ;
+Adv+Spat+Abl:%>дО1 Clitic ;
+Adv+Spat+Loc:%>О1 Clitic ;
+Adv+Spat+Prl:%>Г2а Clitic ;
+Adv+Spat+Loc+Indef+Der/MWN+N:%>О1 kudo-N2-Def-Declension ; 
+Adv+Spat+Prl+Indef+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2а kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;

LEXICON alo-Spat-1Arg
+Po+Spat+Abl:%>дО1 kudo-Indef--Poss ;
+Po+Spat+Loc:%>О1 kudo-Indef--Poss ; 
+Po+Spat+Lat:%>О1 kudo-Possessive-Before-Clitic ;
+Po+Spat+Prl:%>Г2а kudo-Indef--Poss ;
+Po+Spat+OrthPhon+Loc+Der/це:%>це kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Po+Spat+Loc+Der/се:%>се kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Po+Spat+Der/кс:%>кс osh-N ;
+Po+Spat+Lat+Indef:%>О1в Clitic ;
+Po+Spat+Abl+Indef:%>дО1 kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;
+Po+Spat+Loc+Indef+Der/MWN+N:%>О1 kudo-N2-Def-Declension ; 
+Po+Spat+Prl+Indef+Der/MWN+N:%>Г2а kudo-N2-Def-Declension ;

LEXICON alo-Spat-AdvN
 alo-Spat-NoArg ;
 kal-N ;
+N+Loc:%>О1 Clitic ;
